Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1285.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 3208.2. Prohibition against cooperation with out-of-State abortion investigations.(a) Prohibition.--The applicable individuals and entities in subsection (b) may not provide any information nor expend or use time, money, facilities, property, equipment, personnel or other resources in furtherance of any interstate investigation or proceeding seeking to impose civil or criminal liability upon an individual or entity for:(1) The provision, seeking or receipt of or inquiring about abortion or its related activity, that is legal in this 123456789101112131415161718 Commonwealth.(2) Assisting an individual or entity providing, seeking, receiving or responding to an inquiry about abortion and its related activity, that is legal in this Commonwealth.(b) Applicable individuals and entities.--The prohibition under subsection (a) shall apply to the following individuals and entities:(1) A Commonwealth government entity.(2) A law enforcement agency.(3) A peace officer.(4) A political subdivision of the Commonwealth or a municipal or any other local authority, including its officers, agencies, employees and contractors.(c) Exception.--This section does not apply to an investigation or proceeding if the conduct of the investigation or proceeding would be a violation of the laws of this Commonwealth.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth government entity." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "Commonwealth government" under 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions)."Law enforcement agency." Any of the following:(1) The Pennsylvania State Police.(2) The Pennsylvania Capitol Police.(3) The Harrisburg International Airport Police.(4) An airport authority police department.(5) A county park police force under 16 Pa.C.S. § 16511(b) (relating to employees and police).20250HB1285PN1456 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) A public agency of a political subdivision having general police powers and charged with making arrests in connection with the enforcement of the criminal or traffic laws, including the sheriff's office in a county of the second class.(7) A campus police or university police department.(8) A railroad or street railway police department.(9) Any other individual or entity engaged in a law enforcement action."Peace officer." As defined in section 501 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1285PN1456 - 3 - 123456789101112